src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
+N:	NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ	;

LEXICON N_MĪEZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 166
+N:	NMN_MĪEZ	;

LEXICON N_ROʼVZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
 N_ROʼVZ-SG ;
 N_ROʼVZ-PL ;
LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
+N:	NMN_ROʼVZ-SG	;
LEXICON N_ROʼVZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 167 roʼvz:roʼv
+N:	NMN_ROʼVZ-PL	;

LEXICON N_KÄBRĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 168
!!≈ * Yaml: __A-kaebraaz__
+N:	NMN_KÄBRĀZ	;

LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 169
 N_MAIGĀZ-SG ;
 N_MAIGĀZ-PL ;

LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ-SG
+N:	NMN_MAIGĀZ-SG	;
LEXICON N_MAIGĀZ-PL
+N:	NMN_MAIGĀZ-PL	;

LEXICON N_NÕTKĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 170
+N:	NMN_NÕTKĀZ	;

LEXICON N_RIKĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rikāz: 171
+N:	NMN_RIKĀZ	;
LEXICON N_RIKĀZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ rikāz: 171
+N:     NMN_RIKĀZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 172
+N:	NMN_BIKŠĀZ	;
LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 172
+N:	NMN_BIKŠĀZ-SG	;
LEXICON N_BIKŠĀZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 172
+N:     NMN_BIKŠĀZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 173
+N:	NMN_ĀMBAZ	;
LEXICON N_ĀMBAZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 173
+N:     NMN_ĀMBAZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PŪŖAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 174
+N:	NMN_PŪŖAZ	;

LEXICON N_PǬĻAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 175
+N:	NMN_PǬĻAZ	;

LEXICON N_RĒNAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 176
+N:	NMN_RĒNAZ	;
LEXICON N_RĒNAZ-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 176
+N:     NMN_RĒNAZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TŌVAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 177
+N:	NMN_TŌVAZ	;

LEXICON N_PŪORAZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pūoraz: 178
+N:	NMN_PŪORAZ	;

LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ mõtkõz: 179
+N:	NMN_MÕTKÕZ	;
LEXICON N_MÕTKÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ mõtkõz: 179
+N:     NMN_MÕTKÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
	N_VȬRÕZ-SG	;
	N_VȬRÕZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
+N:     NMN_VȬRÕZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_VȬRÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vȭrõz:vȭrõ 180
+N:     NMN_VȬRÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 181 arāgõz:arāgõ
	N_ARĀGÕZ-SG	;
	N_ARĀGÕZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 181
+N:     NMN_ARĀGÕZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ARĀGÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 181
+N:     NMN_ARĀGÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
+N:	NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ	;
LEXICON N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ äʼggõz:äggõz 182
+N:     NMN_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
+N:	NMN_PŪʼDÕZ	;

LEXICON N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pūʼdõz:pūdõz 183
+N:     NMN_PŪʼDÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 184
+N:	NMN_VĪETŠÕZ	;
LEXICON N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 184
+N:     NMN_VĪETŠÕZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LǬʼTŠÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185
+N:	NMN_LǬʼTŠÕZ	;

LEXICON N_SĒJI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 186
+N:	NMN_SĒJI	;

LEXICON N_AKKIJI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ akkiji:akkiji 187
	N_AKKIJI-SG  ;
	N_AKKIJI-PL  ;
LEXICON N_AKKIJI-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 187
+N:     NMN_AKKIJI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_AKKIJI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 187
+N:     NMN_AKKIJI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LĒʼJI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼji:lēji 188
	N_LĒʼJI-SG	;
	N_LĒʼJI-PL	;
LEXICON	N_LĒʼJI-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼji:lēji 188
+N:	NMN_LĒʼJI-SG   ;
LEXICON	N_LĒʼJI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼji:lēji 188
+N:	NMN_LĒʼJI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_TUĻĻI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 189
+N:	NMN_TUĻĻI	;

LEXICON N_LÄʼBḐI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ läʼbḑi:läbḑi 190
+N:	NMN_LÄʼBḐI	;

LEXICON N_NAI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 191
+N:	NMN_NAI	;

LEXICON N_AʼIGI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼigi:aigi 192
+N:	NMN_AʼIGI	;
LEXICON N_AʼIGI-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼigi:aigi 192
+N:     NMN_AʼIGI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PUʼNNI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ puʼnni:punni 193
+N:	NMN_PUʼNNI	;
LEXICON N_PUʼNNI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ puʼnni:punni 193
+N:     NMN_PUʼNNI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KAȚKI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kațki: 194
+N:	NMN_KAȚKI	;

LEXICON N_KUKKI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kukki: 195
+N:	NMN_KUKKI	;

LEXICON N_AIGI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aigi:aigi 196
+N:	NMN_AIGI	;

LEXICON N_OUKI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 197
+N:	NMN_OUKI	;

LEXICON N_PAŖĪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 198
+N:	NMN_PAŖĪ	;

LEXICON N_TŪĻI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 199
!! ~422
+N:	NMN_TŪĻI	;
LEXICON N_TŪĻI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 199
+N:	NMN_TŪĻI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_AʼBLI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbli:aʼbli 200
!! ~567
 N_AʼBLI-SG ;
 N_AʼBLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_AʼBLI-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbli:aʼbli 200
+N: NMN_AʼBLI-SG ;
LEXICON N_AʼBLI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbli:aʼbli 200
+N: NMN_AʼBLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_SĒMI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 201
	N_SĒMI-SG	;
	N_SĒMI-PL	;

LEXICON N_SĒMI-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 201
+N:     NMN_SĒMI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_SĒMI-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 201
+N:     NMN_SĒMI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_LĒʼMI !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
!!= Yaml: __A-aqrlimi__
	N_LĒʼMI-SG	;
	N_LĒʼMI-PL	;

LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-SG	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
+N:     NMN_LĒʼMI-SG   ;
LEXICON N_LĒʼMI-PL	!!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
+N:     NMN_LĒʼMI-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ALĪZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 203
	N_ALĪZ-SG	;
	N_ALĪZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_ALĪZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 203
+N:     NMN_ALĪZ-SG   ;
LEXICON N_ALĪZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 203
+N:     NMN_ALĪZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_NȬŖKÕZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 204
+N:	NMN_NȬŖKÕZ	;

LEXICON N_KATŪKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 205
+N:	NMN_KATŪKS	;

LEXICON N_KATŪKS-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 205
+N:     NMN_KATŪKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āndõks: 206
+N:	NMN_ĀNDÕKS	;
LEXICON N_ĀNDÕKS-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ āndõks: 206
+N:     NMN_ĀNDÕKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_KĒRATÕKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kēratõks:kēratõks 207
+N:	NMN_KĒRATÕKS	;

LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
+N:	NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS	;
LEXICON N_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
+N:     NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL   ;

LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 209
 N_VARĪKŠ-SG ;
 N_VARĪKŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ-SG
+N:	NMN_VARĪKŠ-SG	;
LEXICON N_VARĪKŠ-PL
+N:	NMN_VARĪKŠ-PL	;

LEXICON N_UKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 210
+N:	NMN_UKŠ	;

LEXICON N_LÄPŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ läpš:laps 211
+N:    NMN_LÄPŠ ;
LEXICON N_LÄPŠ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ läpš:laps 211
+N:    NMN_LÄPŠ-PL ;

LEXICON N_RIŠTĪNG-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 212
+N:	NMN_RIŠTĪNG-SG	;

LEXICON N_ROʼVZT-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ roʼvzt:roʼvz 212
+N:	NMN_ROʼVZT-PL	;

LEXICON N_TUʼĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 213
+N:	NMN_TUʼĻ	;

LEXICON N_TŪĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 214
+N:	NMN_TŪĻ	;

LEXICON N_KĒĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kēļ:kēl 215
+N:	NMN_KĒĻ	;

LEXICON N_PŪOL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 216 pūol:pūol
+N:	NMN_PŪOL	;

LEXICON N_PŪOL-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 216
+N:     NMN_PŪOL-PL   ;

LEXICON N_ĪKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 217
+N:	NMN_ĪKŠ	;

LEXICON N_KAKŠ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 218
+N:	NMN_KAKŠ	;

LEXICON N_ŪŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 219
+N:	NMN_ŪŽ	;

LEXICON N_SĒŅ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ sēņ:sēn 220
+N:	NMN_SĒŅ	;

LEXICON N_JŪŖ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ jūŗ:jūr 221
+N:	NMN_JŪŖ	;
LEXICON N_JŪŖ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 221
+N:     NMN_JŪŖ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_SŪR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 222
+N:	NMN_SŪR	;

LEXICON N_SĒR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 223
+N:	NMN_SĒR	;

LEXICON N_BIRKOV !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 224 birkov:birkov
 N_BIRKOV-SG	 ;
 N_BIRKOV-PL	 ;
LEXICON N_BIRKOV-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 224	birkov:birkov
+N:	NMN_BIRKOV-SG	;
LEXICON N_BIRKOV-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 224	birkov:birkov
+N:	NMN_BIRKOV-PL	;

LEXICON N_SALĀJ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 225
+N:	NMN_SALĀJ	;
LEXICON N_SALĀJ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : 225
+N:	NMN_SALĀJ-SG	;

LEXICON N_UMĀRZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ umārz:umār 226
+N:	NMN_UMĀRZ  ;
LEXICON N_UMĀRZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ umārz:umār 226
+N:	NMN_UMĀRZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
	N_DULLÕNZ-SG	  ;
	N_DULLÕNZ-PL	  ;
LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
+N:	NMN_DULLÕNZ-SG	  ;
LEXICON N_DULLÕNZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ dullõnz:dullõn 227
+N:	NMN_DULLÕNZ-PL	  ;

LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
	N_AʼBBÕNZ-SG	;
	N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL	;
LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
+N:	NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-SG       ;
LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
+N:	NMN_AʼBBÕNZ-PL       ;

LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
+N:	NMN_AŅGÕRZ  ;
LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
+N:     NMN_AŅGÕRZ-PL    ;

LEXICON N_KAʼGGÕRZ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
+N:	NMN_KAʼGGÕRZ   ;
LEXICON N_KAʼGGÕRZ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230
+N:	NMN_KAʼGGÕRZ-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PǞGIŅŽ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
+N:	NMN_PǞGIŅŽ      ;
