src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
aʼigi:aʼigi N_AʼIGI  "seinän, aidan reuna, vieri" ;
aʼigizt:aʼigi N_AʼIGI-PL  "irtaimisto" ;
bikšāz:bikšā N_BIKŠĀZ-SG  "housut" ;
biltbikšõd:bilt#bikšā N_BIKŠĀZ-PL  "YY" ;
ikškõrdikš:ikš#kõrd#ikš N_ĪKŠ  "kertotaulu" ;
kikaʼbbõnd:kik#aʼbbõn N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL  "kukonheltta" ;
kikbikšõd:kik#bikšā N_BIKŠĀZ-PL  "kevätesikko" ;
kitšāaʼbbõnd:kitšā#aʼbbõnd N_AʼBBÕNZ  "pukinparta" ;
kiʼrsūord:kiʼr#sūor N_JŪŖ-PL  "niskasuonet" ;
kätsāz:kätsā N_NÕTKĀZ  "kalvosin" ;
kǭtšõd:kǭtšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ-PL  "housut" ;
lipskõz:lipskõ N_MÕTKÕZ  "tukku" ;
läpš:laps N_LÄPŠ  "lapsi" ;
lǟlamõz:lǟlamõ N_ARĀGÕZ  "raskaus" ;
lǭʼtšõz:lǭʼtšõ N_LǬʼTŠÕZ  "ruiskattara" ;
marspūŗaz:mars#pūŗa N_PŪŖAZ  "märssypurje" ;
matūkst:matūkst N_KATŪKS-PL  "hautajaiset" ;
mǭroʼvz:mǭ#roʼv N_ROʼVZ  "maalaisväestö" ;
naioppiji:nai#oppiji N_AKKIJI  "oppityttö" ;
naizmīez:naiz#mīʼe N_MĪEZ  "aviomies" ;
paļgõd:pāļga N_ĀMBAZ-PL  "länget" ;
pițki:pițki N_KAȚKI  "ukkonen" ;
piʼņripskõz:piʼņ#ripskõ N_MÕTKÕZ  "hukanputki" ;
postkǭrtõz:post#kǭrtõ N_VȬRÕZ  "postikortti" ;
purōv:purōv N_BIRKOV  "purjo" ;
puțkõjērnaz:puțkõ#jērna N_ĀMBAZ  "hajuherne" ;
põzāgõd:põzāgõ N_ARĀGÕZ-PL  "roskat" ;
pālkanai:pālka#nai N_NAI  "palvelijatar" ;
pēļi:pēļi N_TŪĻI  "upseeri" ;
pūašrattõd:pū#aš#ratā N_RIKĀZ-PL  "YY" ;
pūoltōvaz:pūol#tōva N_TŌVAZ  "puolimyrsky" ;
pūoraz:pūora N_PŪORAZ  "porsas" ;
pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ N_PǞGIŅŽ  "paljous" ;
pǟvapiʼmdõks:pǟva#piʼmdõks N_ÄʼBȚÕKS  "auringonpimennys" ;
rapšõz:rapšõ N_VĪETŠÕZ  "rapsi" ;
rattõdtēji:rattõd#tēji N_SĒJI  "vaunuseppä" ;
reinõd:rēna N_RĒNAZ-PL  "YY" ;
reḑḑõlambõd:reḑḑõl#āmba N_ĀMBAZ-PL  "harvat hampaat" ;
riekkēʼji:riek#kēʼji N_LĒʼJI  "tien kulkija" ;
riškizt:riškizt N_TŪĻI-PL  "ristiäiset" ;
roʼugõz:roʼugõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ  "rauhanen" ;
rāndakēļ:rānda#kēl N_KĒĻ  "liivin kieli" ;
rēviļtimi:rēviļtimi N_AʼBLI  "ryöstö" ;
rǭgõd:rǭgõ N_VȬRÕZ-PL  "risu" ;
saʼbriki:saʼbriki N_LĒʼMI  "saukko" ;
sigādõz:sigādõz N_NȬŖKÕZ  "sikamaisuus" ;
sigānaʼggõrd:sigā#naʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ-PL  "sianperunat" ;
sižālikki:sižālikki N_KUKKI  "sisilisko" ;
suodārattõd:suodā#ratā N_RIKĀZ-PL  "sotavaunut" ;
suʼlli:suʼl N_PUʼNNI  "renki" ;
sēr:sēr N_SĒR  "sääri" ;
sūdlõks:sūdlõks N_ĀNDÕKS  "suudelma" ;
sūlaʼggõd:sū#laʼggõ N_ÄʼGGÕZ-PL  "suulaki" ;
sūoļ:sūol N_TŪĻ  "suoli" ;
sūrpūŗaz:sūr#pūŗa N_PŪŖAZ  "isopurje" ;
sǟr:sǟr N_SŪR  "sadepilvi" ;
sǟʼrmõz:sǟʼrmõ N_PŪʼDÕZ  "kärppä" ;
tagāntuļļi:tagān#tuļļi N_TUĻĻI  "jälkeläinen" ;
taʼllizt:taʼllizt N_PUʼNNI-PL  "telineet" ;
tieudmīez:tieud#mīʼe N_MĪEZ  "tutkija" ;
tingmõd:tingmõ N_MÕTKÕZ-PL  "nurin tongittu maa" ;
tortläʼbḑi:tort#läʼbḑi N_LÄʼBḐI  "kakkulapio" ;
tsitronkūoŗ:tsitron#kūor N_JŪŖ  "sitruunankuori" ;
tuoiztpūold:tuoizt#pūol N_PŪOL-PL  "jälkeiset" ;
tīeroʼvz:tīe#roʼv N_ROʼVZ  "työväestö" ;
tīlkaz:tīlka N_ĀMBAZ  "jääpuikko" ;
tōvaz:tōva N_TŌVAZ  "myrsky" ;
tūlkaʼggõrz:tūl#kaʼggõr N_AŅGÕRZ  "hukkakaura" ;
tǭlauʼņ:tǭla#uʼņ N_TUʼĻ  "talviuni" ;
ukš:ukš N_UKŠ  "ovi" ;
umārz:umār N_UMĀRZ  "omena" ;
vaimandõkst:vaim#andõkst N_ĀNDÕKS-PL  "hengenlahjat" ;
vajāgõz:vajāgõ N_ARĀGÕZ  "tarve" ;
vaʼnbizt:vaʼnbizt N_SĒMI-PL  "vanhemmat" ;
veļīlapst:veļī#lapst N_LÄPŠ-PL  "veljen lapset" ;
veʼļki:veʼļki N_SĒMI  "pikkuveli" ;
vieʼdtõkst:vieʼdtõkst N_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL  "tiskivesi" ;
vieʼrkazāj:vieʼr#kazāj N_SALĀJ  "verisyöpä" ;
viltsīņtõbtupūks:viltsīņtõb#tupūks N_KATŪKS  "ruko" ;
vǟʼrõd:vǟʼrõ N_PŪʼDÕZ-PL  "portti" ;
vȯstājizt:vȯstājizt N_AKKIJI-PL  "ostajakunta" ;
vȯʼddõrsūrmõd:vȯʼddõr#sūrmõ N_VȬRÕZ-PL  "ohraryynit" ;
õpkāz:õpkā N_NÕTKĀZ  "karju" ;
õvātõks:õvātõks N_KĒRATÕKS  "sateenkaari" ;
āinaroʼvzt:āina#roʼvzt N_ROʼVZT-PL  "heinäväki" ;
ēdrõmkukkõrz:ēdrõm#kukkõr N_KAʼGGÕRZ  "kukannuppu" ;
īelõigiz:īel#õigiz N_ALĪZ  "äänestysoikeus" ;
īʼdkäbālizt:īʼd#käbālizt N_AʼBLI-PL  "kavioeläin" ;
ūoļikš:ūoļikš N_VARĪKŠ  "huolto" ;
žnougõd:žnougõ N_MÕTKÕZ-PL  "kidukset" ;
ǭʼgisigāsēņ:ǭʼgi#sigā#sēn N_SĒŅ  "mustarousku" ;
ȭʼdõgizt:ȭʼdõgizt N_LĒʼMI-PL  "illallinen" ;
ȭʼdõgpūol:ȭʼdõg#pūol N_PŪOL  "iltapäivä" ;
sāinakǭrtõz:sāina#kǭrtõ N_VȬRÕZ  "seinäkartta" ;
valdõigizt:vald#õigizt N_ALĪZ-PL  "valtio-oikeus" ;
